North Carolina, session 2025, SB145.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS
SECTION 1.1. The General Assembly makes the following findings:
(1) Transportation plays a vital role in the State's economy; it makes economic
activity possible (e.g., connecting producers to raw materials, workers, and
customers) and is a major economic activity in its own right.
(2) Multiple research studies show a link between access to transportation and
economic mobility.
(3) Sound transportation investments lower the costs of moving people and goods,
thereby increasing economic productivity and improving standards of living.
(4) Some studies have suggested that traffic congestion costs the United States
economy over one hundred twenty billion dollars ($120,000,000,000)
annually.
(5) Potential costs of congestion include those related to increased travel time,
added fuel costs, increased unreliability, emissions and environmental
damage, excess vehicle operating costs, loss of productivity, increased
inventory costs, and higher frequency of cargo delays.
(6) Research studies have linked traffic congestion to higher rates of depression
and anxiety, lower job and overall satisfaction, and even increased rates of
domestic violence.
(7) Traffic congestion is typically a bigger problem in more urbanized and rapidly
growing areas.
(8) North Carolina is home to urbanized and rapidly growing areas that are
experiencing the negative effects of traffic congestion.
(9) Congestion begins slowing the employment growth rate in a region at
approximately 37 annual hours of commuter delay and halts growth altogether
at 180 annual hours of commuter delay.
(10) According to the Texas A&M Transportation Institute, the
Charlotte-Concord-Gastonia MSA reached 38 annual hours of commuter
delay in 2000 and climbed to 53 hours in 2019.
*S145-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(11) In 20 years, the Charlotte region's population will grow by fifty percent (50%)
from 2,600,000 today to 4,100,000 in 2045.
(12) As congestion continues to increase, it is estimated that up to 126,100 jobs
and three billion dollars ($3,000,000,000) in tax receipts could go unrealized
by the end of 2050 in the Charlotte-Concord-Gastonia MSA.
(13) Additional sources of transportation funding are needed to help these areas
address congestion so as not to impede future economic growth.

PART II. REVISIONS TO CURRENT MECKLENBURG COUNTY SALES TAX FOR
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION
SECTION 2.1. Reserved.
SECTION 2.2. G.S. 105-507.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-507.2. Levy and collection Levy, collection, and repeal of sales and use tax.
(a) If the majority of those voting in a referendum held pursuant to G.S. 105-507.1 vote
for the levy of the tax, the board of commissioners of the county may, by resolution, levy one-half
percent (½%) local sales and use taxes in addition to any other State and local sales and use taxes
levied pursuant to law. Except as provided in this Part, the adoption, levy, collection,
administration, and repeal of these additional taxes shall be in accordance with Article 39 of this
Chapter. In applying the provisions of Article 39 of this Chapter to this Part, references to 'this
Article' mean 'Part 1 of Article 43 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes'.
(b) No action by a county to repeal a tax levied under this Part may become effective
while previously issued or, as provided in this subsection, refinanced, bonds, notes, or other
financing secured or payable by receipts derived from the tax allocated to a municipality or a
transportation authority by the county remain outstanding. Nothing in this Part obligates a county
to exercise any power of taxation or restricts the ability of the county to repeal the tax previously
levied. If a county repeals a tax levied under this Part, a municipality or transportation authority
may refinance previously issued bonds, notes, or other financing that are secured or payable by
receipts for the tax revenue under this Part to reduce debt service as allowed under the law so
long as the refinancing does not extend the date of maturity for the previously issued bonds,
notes, or other financing."
SECTION 2.3. Reserved.
SECTION 2.4. G.S. 105-507.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-507.3. Distribution and use of taxes.
(a) Distribution. – The Secretary shall, on a monthly basis, allocate to each taxing county
the net proceeds of the tax levied under this Part by that county. If the Secretary collects taxes
under this Part in a month and the taxes cannot be identified as being attributable to a particular
taxing county, the Secretary shall allocate these taxes among the taxing counties, in proportion
to the amount of taxes collected in each county under this Part in that month and shall include
them in the monthly distribution.
The Secretary shall distribute the net proceeds of the tax levied by a county on a per capita
basis among the county and the units of local government in the county that operate public
transportation systems. to the largest transportation authority that includes the county. No
proceeds shall be distributed to a county that does not operate a public transportation system or
to a unit of local government transportation authority that does not operate a public transportation
system.
(b) Use. – A county must allocate the net proceeds distributed to it in accordance with its
financial plan adopted pursuant to G.S. 105-507 and use the net proceeds only for financing,
constructing, operating, and maintaining local public transportation systems. Any other unit of
local government transportation authority may use the net proceeds distributed to it under this
Part only for financing, constructing, operating, and maintaining local public transportation
Page 2 Senate Bill 145-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
systems. Every unit of government shall use the net proceeds to supplement and not to supplant
or replace existing funds or other resources for public transportation systems."
SECTION 2.5. Section 2.4 of this act becomes effective only if Mecklenburg County
levies a tax authorized under Part IV of this act. If Mecklenburg County levies a tax authorized
under Part IV of this act, then Section 2.4 of this act is effective on the same date that the tax
levied under that Part becomes effective. The remainder of this Part is effective when it becomes
law.

PART III. REVISIONS TO CURRENT MECKLENBURG COUNTY U-DRIVE-IT TAX
SECTION 3.1. Section 3.1 of S.L. 1997-417, as added by Section 30 of S.L.
2006-162 and amended by Section 2(h) of S.L. 2009-527, reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 3.1. A county authorized to impose a tax under Part 2 of Article 43 of Chapter
105 of the General Statutes is considered an authority under Article 50 of Chapter 105 of the
General Statutes, as enacted by Section 3 of this act, and the board of commissioners of that
county is considered the board of trustees of the authority under Article 50. G.S. 105-554 of
Article 50 does not apply to the proceeds of a tax imposed by a county considered an authority
under this section. The proceeds of a tax imposed by a county considered an authority under this
section must be transferred to the largest city in metropolitan public transportation authority
including that county operating a public transportation system and used only for financing,
constructing, operating, and maintaining a public transportation system. The proceeds may
supplant existing funds allocated for a public transportation system. The term 'public
transportation system' has the same meaning as defined in G.S. 105-506.1."
SECTION 3.2. This Part becomes effective only if Mecklenburg County levies a tax
authorized under Part IV of this act. If Mecklenburg County levies a tax authorized under Part
IV of this act, then this Part is effective on the same date that the tax levied under that Part
becomes effective.

PART IV. ADDITIONAL MECKLENBURG COUNTY ROADWAY SYSTEMS AND
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION SYSTEMS SALES TAX
SECTION 4.1. Title. – This Part is the Mecklenburg County Roadway Systems and
Public Transportation Systems Sales Tax Act and may be cited by that name. This Part gives
Mecklenburg County an opportunity to obtain an additional source of revenue with which to meet
its needs for financing roadway systems and public transportation systems. It provides the County
with authority to levy sales and use taxes. All such taxes must be approved in a referendum.
SECTION 4.2. Definitions. – The definitions in G.S. 105-164.3, G.S. 105-506.1,
and the following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Eligible municipality. – Any of the following municipalities in Mecklenburg
County: the City of Charlotte and the Towns of Cornelius, Davidson,
Huntersville, Matthews, Mint Hill, and Pineville.
(2) Red Line. – A rail project that includes, at a minimum, service from the center
of the City of Charlotte through the towns of Cornelius, Davidson, and
Huntersville and, provided that agreement is obtained from applicable local
governments outside of Mecklenburg County, continues to a point north of
the jurisdiction of the Town of Davidson, and in no event shall the terminus
be in the Town of Davidson's jurisdiction unless approved by the Town of
Davidson.
(3) Roadway system. – A roadway together with appurtenances to a roadway
which includes, but is not limited to, plans, designs, and related studies;
rights-of-way, whether conveyed by deed or easement; construction,
maintenance, and improvements to streets and highways, intersections,
streetscapes and landscaping, pedestrian facilities, bicycle facilities, parking
Senate Bill 145-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
lots, curbs, gutters, storm drainage, bridges, overpasses, grade crossings, street
lighting, and traffic control devices; utility relocations; publicly accessible
electric vehicle charging infrastructure, hydrogen fueling infrastructure,
propane fueling infrastructure, natural gas fueling infrastructure, and
vehicle-to-grid infrastructure; current and emerging intelligent transportation
technologies, including the ability of vehicles to communicate with
infrastructure, buildings, and other road users; projects that facilitate
intermodal connections between emerging transportation technologies, such
as magnetic levitation and hyperloop; protective features, including natural
infrastructure, to enhance the resilience of a transportation facility; and
measures to protect a roadway system from cybersecurity threats.
SECTION 4.3. Exemption of Food. – A tax levied under this Part does not apply to
the sales price of food that is exempt from tax pursuant to G.S. 105-164.13B or to the sales price
of a bundled transaction taxable pursuant to G.S. 105-467(a)(5a).
SECTION 4.4.(a) Advisory Referendum. – The Mecklenburg County Board of
Commissioners may direct the county board of elections to conduct an advisory referendum
within the County on the question of whether a local sales and use tax at the rate of one percent
(1%) may be levied in accordance with this Part. The election shall be held in accordance with
the procedures of G.S. 163-287. The Board of Commissioners shall hold a public hearing on the
question at least 30 days before the date the election is to be held.
SECTION 4.4.(b) Ballot Question. – The form of the question to be presented on a
ballot for a special election concerning the levy of a tax authorized by this Part shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
One percent (1%) local sales and use taxes, in addition to the current local sales and
use taxes, to be used only for roadway systems and public transportation systems."
SECTION 4.5. Levy of Tax. – The Board of Commissioners may, by resolution,
levy one percent (1%) local sales and use taxes in addition to any other State and local sales and
use taxes levied pursuant to law only if all of the following conditions are satisfied:
(1) The majority of those voting in a referendum held pursuant to Section 4.4(a)
of this Part vote for the levy of the tax.
(2) The General Assembly has enacted authorizing legislation that would allow a
public transportation authority (hereafter "the Authority") that includes
Mecklenburg County to be established, and the Authority has been
established.
(3) At least one eligible municipality or an Authority maintains a public
transportation system in the County.
SECTION 4.6. Administration. – Except as otherwise provided in this Part, the
adoption, levy, collection, administration, and repeal of these additional taxes shall be in
accordance with Article 39 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes. Nothing in this Part obligates
Mecklenburg County to exercise any power of taxation or restricts the ability of the County to
repeal the tax previously levied.
SECTION 4.7. Distribution. – The Secretary of Revenue shall, on a monthly basis,
distribute to Mecklenburg County the net proceeds of the tax levied under this Part. Mecklenburg
County must distribute forty percent (40%) of the net proceeds of a tax levied under this Part as
provided in Section 4.8 of this act and sixty percent (60%) of the net proceeds of a tax levied
under this Part as provided in Section 4.9 of this act.
SECTION 4.8. Roadway Distribution and Use. – Mecklenburg County must
distribute forty percent (40%) of the net proceeds of a tax levied under this Part among the eligible
municipalities as provided in this section. Each eligible municipality shall annually submit to the
County a copy of the statement certified by a registered engineer or surveyor that is submitted to
the Department of Transportation under G.S. 136-41.1(a) of the total number of miles of streets
Page 4 Senate Bill 145-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
in that municipality that are not part of the State highway system. The word "street" as used under
this section has the same definition as provided in G.S. 136-41.1(a). Each eligible municipality
shall use the net proceeds distributed to it under this section only for costs associated with
financing, constructing, operating, or maintaining roadway systems.
(1) Procedure. The following amounts must be computed before the distribution
of any tax proceeds under this section:
a. The monthly amount for each eligible municipality other than the City
of Charlotte is equal to one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the
greater of the following two amounts:
1. The amount generated by multiplying the net proceeds
distributed under this section during a month by the percentage
proportion that the mileage of streets in the eligible
municipality that do not form a part of the State highway
system bears to the total mileage of the streets that do not
constitute a part of the State highway system in all eligible
municipalities combined.
2. The sum of the following:
I. The amount generated by multiplying seventy-five
percent (75%) of the net proceeds distributed under this
section during a month by the percentage proportion
that the population of the eligible municipality bears to
the total population of all eligible municipalities
according to the most recent annual estimates of
population as certified to the Secretary of Revenue by
the State Budget Officer.
II. The amount generated by multiplying twenty-five
percent (25%) of the net proceeds distributed under this
section during a month in the percentage proportion
that the mileage of streets in each eligible municipality
that do not form a part of the State highway system
bears to the total mileage of the streets that do not
constitute a part of the State highway system in all
eligible municipalities combined.
b. The monthly amount for the City of Charlotte is the remainder of net
proceeds to be distributed under this section during a month after the
amounts for the other eligible municipalities are determined under
Section 4.8(1)a. of this act.
c. The annual amount for an eligible municipality is equal to the sum of
the 12 monthly amounts for that municipality.
d. The baseline amount for an eligible municipality other than the City
of Charlotte is equal to the following:
1. For fiscal years beginning on or after the effective date of the
levy of the tax but prior to the first full fiscal year beginning
on or after one year after the effective date of the levy of the
tax, the baseline amount is zero.
2. For fiscal years beginning on or after at least one full fiscal
year after the effective date of the levy of the tax but before the
release of census data by the U.S. Census Bureau for the next
decennial census, the annual amount as calculated under
Section 4.8(1)c. of this act for the first full fiscal year beginning
on or after the effective date of the levy of the tax.
Senate Bill 145-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
3. For later fiscal years, the annual amount as calculated under
Section 4.8(1)c. of this act for the first fiscal year beginning on
or after the release of census data by the U.S. Census Bureau
for the most recent decennial census.
e. The baseline amount for the City of Charlotte is zero.
(2) Distribution. The distribution of net proceeds under this subdivision is as
follows:
a. For the first 11 months of the fiscal year, the County shall distribute
the monthly amount to each eligible municipality.
b. For the final month of the fiscal year, the distribution is as follows:
1. If the total net proceeds distributed to the County for the fiscal
year are less than the total net proceeds distributed to the
County for the preceding fiscal year, the County shall
distribute the monthly amount to each eligible municipality.
2. If the total net proceeds distributed to the County for the fiscal
year are greater than the total net proceeds distributed to the
County for the preceding fiscal year, the County shall
distribute the proceeds as follows:
I. If the annual amount for each municipality is greater
than the baseline amount for that municipality, the
monthly amount.
II. Except as provided in Section 4.8(2)b.2.III. of this act,
if the annual amount for any municipality is less than
the baseline amount for that municipality, then the
following:
A. The amount to be distributed to each eligible
municipality whose annual amount is less than
the baseline amount is the amount needed so
that the total amount distributed to that
municipality for the fiscal year is equal to the
baseline amount.
B. The amount to be distributed to the other
eligible municipalities is the monthly amount as
reduced by this sub-sub-sub-sub-subdivision.
The amount of the reduction is equal to the
difference between the annual amount and the
baseline amount for all eligible municipalities
combined that receive a distribution under
Section 4.8(2)b.2.II.A. of this act multiplied by
a percentage. The percentage is equal to the
percentage proportion that the population of the
eligible municipality bears to the total
population of all eligible municipalities subject
to distribution under this
sub-sub-sub-sub-subdivision according to the
most recent annual estimates of population as
certified to the Secretary of Revenue by the
State Budget Officer.
III. If the calculation required in Section 4.8(2)b.2.II.B. of
this act would result in the annual amount for any of
those eligible municipalities to be lower than that
Page 6 Senate Bill 145-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
municipality's baseline amount, then the County shall
distribute to each eligible municipality the monthly
amount.
SECTION 4.9. Public Transportation Distribution and Use. – Mecklenburg County
must distribute sixty percent (60%) of the net proceeds of the tax levied under this Part to the
Authority. The Authority shall use the net proceeds distributed to it under this section only for
costs associated with financing, acquiring, constructing, operating, and maintaining any
combination of real and personal property for a public transportation system. The Authority may
accomplish these purposes by undertaking these activities itself or by entering an interlocal
agreement with a municipality in Mecklenburg County that operates a public transportation
system to use funds allocated under this section for those purposes as directed by the Authority
in the interlocal agreement. An interlocal agreement entered under this section may include a
binding commitment on the part of the Authority to allocate all or a portion of these proceeds to
the municipality for a defined number of years or until a defined condition is met, such as the
satisfaction of any debt that was issued for public transportation systems. In addition, the
Authority may enter an agreement with a private entity whereby that entity uses these funds for
this purpose as directed by the Authority in the agreement. The net proceeds of a tax levied under
this Part that are distributed to the Authority may be included as revenues within the meaning of
G.S. 159-81(4), including any modifications of that statute. The following conditions apply to
the use of funds distributed under this section:
(1) No more than two-thirds of these funds may be used for the capital and
operating costs of rail projects over any period of 30 calendar years combined.
Compliance with this section is first determined at the end of the first 30-year
period, and then annually thereafter based on the previous 30-year period.
Nothing in this section will be interpreted to adversely impact the rights of
bondholders to any funds distributed or pledged to secure bonds, notes, or
other obligations used to finance or refinance real and personal property for a
public transportation system.
(2) The Authority shall complete at least fifty percent (50%) of the Red Line as
evidenced by a scope of work schedule created and submitted by the general
contractor or construction manager on the project before the completion of
any other rail project, absent the existence or occurrence of force majeure
events that delay completion of the Red Line or make completion of the Red
Line impracticable. For the purposes of this section, a scope of work schedule
is defined as a listing of project tasks associated with a project time line that
is updated as the Red Line construction project progresses. For the purposes
of this section, force majeure events include fire, flood, earthquakes, other
elements of nature, acts of war, terrorism, riots, civil disorders, rebellions or
revolutions, nuclear or chemical contamination, epidemics, quarantines, acts
of the federal or State government, a declared state of emergency, strikes or
labor disruptions other than those specific to the Authority, or other conditions
beyond its reasonable control and which, by reasonable diligence, the
Authority is unable to prevent. Should a force majeure event delay or halt the
Red Line project, the Authority shall resume the original Red Line schedule
as soon as practicable when the force majeure event has ceased or subsided.
Planning, design, and construction work may occur simultaneously on other
rail projects, but only to the extent that those activities do not interfere with or
delay the completion of the Red Line.
(3) The Authority shall solicit input from the Towns of Cornelius, Davidson, and
Huntersville on all aspects of the Red Line design, including conceptual
Senate Bill 145-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
design, construction drawings, and station location. If the Red Line extends to
the Town of Mooresville, the Authority shall also solicit input from that Town.
(4) The Authority shall reimburse the City of Charlotte for the acquisition of the
Norfolk Southern O-Line and related property. The amount to be reimbursed
may not be more than the cost to the City of Charlotte to acquire the property
from Norfolk Southern, including any costs for indebtedness incurred by the
City with respect to the acquisition. The Authority and the City of Charlotte
shall jointly agree to a schedule for reimbursement of these costs.
SECTION 4.10. Repeal of Tax. – The Mecklenburg County Board of
Commissioners may by resolution repeal the levy and imposition of the tax in the County as
provided in G.S. 105-473(c). The Board of Commissioners, upon adoption of a repeal resolution,
shall cause a certified copy of the resolution to be delivered immediately to the Secretary of
Revenue. No liability for any tax levied under this Part that attached prior to the effective date
on which a levy is repealed shall be discharged as a result of such repeal, and no right to a refund
of tax or otherwise that accrued prior to the effective date on which a levy is repealed shall be
denied as a result of such repeal. If a county repeals a tax levied under this Part, the Authority or
a municipality may refinance previously issued bonds, notes, or other financing that are secured
or payable by receipts for the tax revenue under this Part to reduce debt service as allowed under
the law so long as the refinancing does not extend the date of maturity for the previously issued
bonds, notes, or other financing. No repeal of taxes levied and imposed under this Part shall be
effective until the latest of the following:
(1) The end of the fiscal year in which the repeal resolution was adopted.
(2) The date by which all previously issued or, as provided in this section,
refinanced bonds, notes, or other financing obtained by the Authority or a
municipality secured or payable by receipts from the tax levied under this Part
have been satisfied.
(3) The date by which the Authority has fully reimbursed the City for the purchase
of the O-Line as required by Section 4.9(4) of this act.

PART V. RESERVED

PART VI. RESERVED

PART VII. RESERVED

PART VIII. RESERVED

PART IX. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
SECTION 9.1. Reserved.
SECTION 9.2. This act becomes law only if the Current Operations Appropriations
Act for the 2025-2026 fiscal year becomes law. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective
at the time the Current Operations Appropriations Act for the 2025-2026 fiscal year becomes
law.
Page 8 Senate Bill 145-First Edition